Illinois, session 104th, HB2436.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Counties Code is amended by changing 5Section 3-4006 as follows: 6    (55 ILCS 5/3-4006)  (from Ch. 34, par. 3-4006)7    Sec. 3-4006. Duties of public defender. The Public 8Defender, as directed by the court, shall act as attorney, 9without fee, before any court within any county for all 10persons who are held in custody or who are charged with the 11commission of any criminal offense, and who the court finds 12are unable to employ counsel.13    The Public Defender shall be the attorney, without fee, 14when so appointed by the court under Section 1-5 of the 15Juvenile Court Act of 1987.16    In cases subject to Section 5-170 of the Juvenile Court 17Act of 1987 involving a minor who was under 15 years of age at 18the time of the commission of the offense, that occurs in a 19county with a full-time public defender office, a public 20defender, without fee or appointment, may represent and have 21access to a minor during a custodial interrogation. In cases 22subject to Section 5-170 of the Juvenile Court Act of 1987 23involving a minor who was under 15 years of age at the time of   HB2436 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 09165 RTM 19221 b1the commission of the offense, that occurs in a county without 2a full-time public defender, the law enforcement agency 3conducting the custodial interrogation shall ensure that the 4minor is able to consult with an attorney who is under contract 5with the county to provide public defender services. 6Representation by the public defender shall terminate at the 7first court appearance if the court determines that the minor 8is not indigent.9    Every court shall, with the consent of the defendant and 10where the court finds that the rights of the defendant would be 11prejudiced by the appointment of the public defender, appoint 12counsel other than the public defender, except as otherwise 13provided in Section 113-3 of the "Code of Criminal Procedure 14of 1963". That counsel shall be compensated as is provided by 15law. He shall also, in the case of the conviction of any such 16person, prosecute any proceeding in review which in his 17judgment the interests of justice require.18    In counties with a population over 3,000,000, the public 19defender, without fee or appointment and with the concurrence 20of the county board, may act as attorney to noncitizens in 21immigration cases. Representation by the public defender in 22immigration cases shall be limited to those arising or being 23heard in immigration courts located within the geographical 24boundaries of the county where the public defender has been 25appointed to office and to those of county residents with 26immigration cases outside of the county unless the board   HB2436 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 09165 RTM 19221 b1authorizes the public defender to provide representation 2beyond those limits outside the county. 3(Source: P.A. 102-410, eff. 1-1-22; 102-1117, eff. 1-13-23.) 4    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 5becoming law.